Wisconsin, session 2025, SB370.
do enact as follows:SB370,13Section 1. 70.11 (12) (d) of the statutes is created to read:SB370,2,10170.11 (12) (d) All the property owned or leased by an organization that is 2exempt from taxation under section 501 (c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code, as 3confirmed by a determination letter issued by the internal revenue service no later 4than March 5, 2009, if all of the property is used for the purposes for which the 5federal income exemption was granted, the property consists of one facility used to 6provide health education and related fitness opportunities to the community, the 7organization has a financial assistance program open to all members of the 8community, and the organization provides free services to individuals who share a 9household with a member of the armed forces of the United States who is deployed 10overseas.SB370,211Section 2. Initial applicability.SB370,2,1212(1) This act first applies to property tax assessments as of January 1, 2026.SB370,2,1313